District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-1201

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-221, § 2, 36 DCR 553
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 7, 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-1001.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 7 of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of § 3-1001 through 3-1032, see § 7 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 7 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 7 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 7 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).